Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1043
Attachment of lands in another county; copy to be filed with register of deeds.

Whenever an attachment shall issue to any other county than the one in which the action is brought, and any lands shall be attached by virtue thereof, it shall be the duty of the officer attaching such property to make out a true copy of the order of attachment, and file the same in the office of the register of deeds of the county where the lands so attached are situated. He shall also certify upon the copy of said order of attachment that the same is a true copy of the original writ received by him, and he shall also endorse thereon the description of the property attached, and the time when the same was attached, under and by virtue of the original order of attachment.

G.S.1873, c. 57, § 1, p. 714;

R.S.1913, § 7772;

C.S.1922, § 8716;

C.S.1929, § 20-1043;

R.S.1943, § 25-1043.